Utah statutes.
32A-12-202 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Unauthorized sale or supply.
A person authorized by this title to sell any alcoholic beverage or product,
and an officer, manager, employee, or agent of that person may not sell, offer
to sell, or otherwise furnish or supply, any alcoholic beverage or product in
any place, or at any day or time other than as authorized by this title or the
rules of the commission.
